dev/mt_wiktionary/noun.all.fat.dix
  <!-- sitwazzjoni; sitwazzjoni; 2 -->
    <pardef n="sitwazzjoni__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiet</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ċerva; ċ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ċ/erva__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erva</l>
          <r>erva<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riev</l>
          <r>erva<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- unità_astronomika; unit; 2 -->
    <pardef n="unit/à_astronomika__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>à_astronomika</l>
          <r>à_astronomika<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ajiet<b/>astronomiċi</l>
          <r>à_astronomika<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- invenzjoni; invenzjoni; 2 -->
    <pardef n="invenzjoni__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiet</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- affezzjoni; affezzjoni; 2 -->
    <pardef n="affezzjoni__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiet</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- annimal; annimal; 2 -->
    <pardef n="annimal__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- fakultà; fakult; 2 -->
    <pardef n="fakult/à__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>à</l>
          <r>à<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ajiet</l>
          <r>à<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- beżżula; b; 2 -->
    <pardef n="b/eżżula__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eżżula</l>
          <r>eżżula<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>żieżel</l>
          <r>eżżula<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ħsieb; ħsi; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ħsi/eb__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eb</l>
          <r>eb<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bijiet</l>
          <r>eb<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- poeżija; poeżij; 2 -->
    <pardef n="poeżij/a__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- tuffieħa; tuffi; 2 -->
    <pardef n="tuffi/eħa__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eħa</l>
          <r>eħa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ħiet</l>
          <r>eħa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- qattusa; q; 2 -->
    <pardef n="q/attusa__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>attusa</l>
          <r>attusa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tates</l>
          <r>attusa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- żiemel; ż; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ż/iemel__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iemel</l>
          <r>iemel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wiemel</l>
          <r>iemel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- liebru; liebr; 2 -->
    <pardef n="liebr/u__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- erezzjoni; erezzjoni; 2 -->
    <pardef n="erezzjoni__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiet</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- vjal; vjal; 2 -->
    <pardef n="vjal__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- tarbija; t; 2 -->
    <pardef n="t/arbija__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arbija</l>
          <r>arbija<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rabi</l>
          <r>arbija<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- gerżuma; g; 2 -->
    <pardef n="g/erżuma__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erżuma</l>
          <r>erżuma<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rieżem</l>
          <r>erżuma<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- deżert; deżert; 2 -->
    <pardef n="deżert__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- dixx; dixx; 2 -->
    <pardef n="dixx__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ijiet</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- għasfur; għas; 2 -->
    <pardef n="għas/fur__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fur</l>
          <r>fur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>afar</l>
          <r>fur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- proprjetà; proprjet; 2 -->
    <pardef n="proprjet/à__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>à</l>
          <r>à<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ajiet</l>
          <r>à<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- evalwazzjoni; evalwazzjoni; 2 -->
    <pardef n="evalwazzjoni__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiet</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- blokka; blokk; 2 -->
    <pardef n="blokk/a__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ok</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- dukessa; dukess; 2 -->
    <pardef n="dukess/a__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="sitwazzjoni"><i>sitwazzjoni</i><par n="sitwazzjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ċerva"><i>ċ</i><par n="ċ/erva__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="unità_astronomika"><i>unit</i><par n="unit/à_astronomika__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="invenzjoni"><i>invenzjoni</i><par n="invenzjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="affezzjoni"><i>affezzjoni</i><par n="affezzjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="annimal"><i>annimal</i><par n="annimal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="fakultà"><i>fakult</i><par n="fakult/à__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="beżżula"><i>b</i><par n="b/eżżula__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ħsieb"><i>ħsi</i><par n="ħsi/eb__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="poeżija"><i>poeżij</i><par n="poeżij/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="tuffieħa"><i>tuffi</i><par n="tuffi/eħa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="qattusa"><i>q</i><par n="q/attusa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="żiemel"><i>ż</i><par n="ż/iemel__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="liebru"><i>liebr</i><par n="liebr/u__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="erezzjoni"><i>erezzjoni</i><par n="erezzjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="vjal"><i>vjal</i><par n="vjal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tarbija"><i>t</i><par n="t/arbija__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="gerżuma"><i>g</i><par n="g/erżuma__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="deżert"><i>deżert</i><par n="deżert__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dixx"><i>dixx</i><par n="dixx__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="għasfur"><i>għas</i><par n="għas/fur__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="proprjetà"><i>proprjet</i><par n="proprjet/à__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="evalwazzjoni"><i>evalwazzjoni</i><par n="evalwazzjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="blokka"><i>blokk</i><par n="blokk/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="dukessa"><i>dukess</i><par n="dukess/a__n_f"/></e>
